Utah statutes.
16-16-1502.   Member approval of other disposition of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, license, or other disposition of assets of a limited cooperative association, other than a disposition described in Section 16-16-1501, requires approval of the association's members under Sections 16-16-1503 and 16-16-1504 if the disposition leaves the association without significant continuing business activity.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

